Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-522
Fire engine house; bonds; issuance; amount.

The council may issue bonds of the city not to exceed thirty thousand dollars in any one year for the purpose of erecting fire engine houses.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 18, p. 476;

C.S.1922, § 3643;

C.S.1929, § 14-520;

R.S.1943, § 14-522.